Montana, session 2025, LC1429.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Montana constitution study commission. (1) There is a Montana
constitution study commission. The commission consists of 12 members appointed as follows:
(a) The speaker of the house shall appoint five members. Four of the five members appointed by
the speaker must be citizens of Montana. The fifth member may be a resident of another state but must be a
natural born citizen of the United States;
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1429.1
(b) The president of the senate shall appoint five members. Four of the five members appointed by
the president must be citizens of Montana. The fifth member may be a resident of another state but must be a
natural born citizen of the United States;
(c) The governor shall appoint two members, both of whom must be Montana citizens.
(2) (a) Commission members may not be employed by or elected to a position in a local, state,
tribal, or federal government entity.
(b) Appointments to the commission must be made within 30 days of [the effective date of this act].
A vacancy on the commission must be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.
(c) Commission members are entitled to reimbursement for expenses as provided in 2-18-501
through 2-18-503.
(3) The commission shall study the following aspects of the 1972 Montana constitution:
(a) the reasons the constitution has been amended often;
(b) the provisions of the constitution that conflict with or are in violation of the United States
constitution, including provisions relating to the naturalization of citizens, provisions that are enjoined, or
provisions conflicting with a decision of the United States supreme court that has not been overruled;
(c) the enabling legislation for the 1972 constitutional convention and the ratification processes for
the 1889 and 1972 constitutions to determine how a future convention could be composed, governed, and
funded; and
(d) any deficiency in the Montana constitution identified by the commission.
(4) The commission shall:
(a) meet at least once a month and shall complete its work by September 15, 2026; and
(b) provide a copy of any findings and recommendations to the legislative council.
(5) The legislative services division shall provide staff assistance to the commission.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Contingent voidness. (1) Pursuant to Joint Rule 40-65, if [this act] does
not include an appropriation prior to being transmitted to the governor, then [this act] is void.
(2) If an appropriation funding the commission is vetoed by the governor and the veto is not
overridden, then [this act] is void.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1429.1

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Termination. [This act] terminates December 31, 2026.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – ****